Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
The Militia

§ 33-5-1.
Composition of the Militia.

The militia of the State of Mississippi shall consist of all able-bodied citizens of the state between the ages of seventeen (17) and sixty-two (62) years, who are not exempt by law of this state or of the United States, together with all other able-bodied persons who shall voluntarily enlist or accept commission, appointment or assignment to duty therein, subject to such classifications as may be hereinafter prescribed. The militia shall be divided into three (3) classes: The National Guard, the Mississippi State Guard, and the unorganized militia. The unorganized militia shall consist of all persons liable to service in the militia, but not members of the National Guard or the Mississippi State Guard.

A seventeen-year-old person shall not be allowed to enlist or be assigned to duty without the written consent of both parents, if living, or one (1) parent if one (1) is deceased, or if both parents are deceased, the guardian of such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-21; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 11; Laws, 1973, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1973).

§ 33-5-3.
Enrollment of militia.

Whenever the Governor deems it necessary, he may order an enrollment to be made by officers designated by him of all persons liable to service in the militia of this state. Such enrollment shall include such information as the Governor may require. Three (3) copies thereof shall be made: One (1) copy shall be filed in the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the enrollment is made, and two (2) copies in the office of the Adjutant General. Enrollment shall be made upon such notice and in such manner as the Governor may direct. Every person required by such notice to enroll who wilfully fails or refuses to do so shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) or by confinement in jail not to exceed twenty-five days (25), or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-22; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 12, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-5.
Exemption from service in the militia.

The following persons shall be exempt from military service in the militia of this state:

Persons exempt from military service by the laws of the United States;

All regularly or duly ordained ministers of religion and rabbis, installed according to the rules of their sect, and all students preparing for any such ministry in recognized theological or divinity schools;

All state officers; executive, legislative and judicial;

All county, municipal, and district officers;

All persons actually employed as teachers in any established school, college or university;

Such classes of persons, grouped by age and profession or vocation, as the Governor may deem necessary for the maintenance of the civilian population of the state and whose exemption will be compatible with the military needs of the country. The Governor shall make or remove such exemption as he may see fit by general public proclamation.

The above persons exempt from military duty in the militia will not be exempt from enrollment, but at the time of enrollment shall file verified claims for exemption from military service in such form and manner as the Governor may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 13, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-7.
Appointment of boards to determine exemptions.

The Governor shall appoint boards vested with the authority and power of passing upon and determining the claims of exemption filed under Section 33-5-5. An appeal to the Governor may be taken from the decision of the boards of the state by any person interested in the matter, within the time prescribed by regulation promulgated by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 14, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-9.
Unorganized militia; when subject to duty.

The unorganized militia, or any part thereof, shall not be subject to any active military duty, except when called into the service of the United States or when called into the service of this state by the Governor in case of war, rebellion, insurrections, invasion, tumult, riot, breach of the peace, public calamity or catastrophe or other state or national emergency or imminent danger thereof. When the militia of this state, or any part thereof, is called forth under the constitution and laws of the United States, the Governor shall first order out for service the National Guard, and then the Mississippi State Guard, or such parts thereof as may be necessary, and if the number available be insufficient, he shall then order out such part of the unorganized militia as he may deem that the necessity requires.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-25; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 15, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-11.
Manner of ordering out unorganized militia.

The Governor, when ordering out the unorganized militia, shall designate the number and classes to be called. He may order them out either by calling for volunteers or by draft. He may attach them to the several organizations of the National Guard or the Mississippi State Guard, as may be best for the service, provided that no additional organization or unit shall be created from the unorganized militia until the units of the National Guard are brought to their full authorized strength. During the absence of organizations of the National Guard in the service of the United States, their state designations shall not be given to new organizations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-26; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 16, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-13.
Draft of unorganized militia.

If the unorganized militia is ordered out by draft, the Governor may appoint the number by draft according to the population of the several counties of the state, or otherwise, and shall notify the sheriff of each county, from which any draft is so required, of the number of persons his county is to furnish. Upon the requisition of the Governor being received by the sheriff, the sheriff shall immediately notify the clerk of the circuit court of the county, or in the absence of the said clerk or his inability to act, then his legally authorized deputy or deputies, who shall repair to the office of said clerk and in public copy from the most recent enrollment those persons liable for service under such draft of the unorganized militia, by name or number, the persons shown thereon. Such names or their corresponding numbers shall be placed on slips of paper of the same size and appearance, as nearly as practicable, which slips shall be placed in a box suitable for the purpose and the number required to fill such draft drawn therefrom by the clerk or his legally authorized deputy. The sheriff shall serve upon the persons so drafted a written order from the Governor specifying at what time and at what place they shall appear and report to the officer specified by the Governor. The sheriff shall make return to the clerk of all persons drawn who could not be found, and the clerk shall then draw as many additional names as may be required to complete the draft or to replace those, who, having been drawn, have been rejected by the military authorities for disability, and continue in like manner until the draft is completed and accepted by the military authorities. The Governor may prescribe rules and regulations for conducting the draft and may designate additional officers to assist the respective clerks and sheriffs conducting the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-27; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 17, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-15.
Fees.

As compensation for services rendered under this chapter, circuit clerks shall receive Two Cents (2¢) for each name placed in the box and sheriffs shall receive Fifty Cents (50¢) for each person notified. Such fees shall be paid by warrant of the state auditor on requisitions approved by the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-28; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 18, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-5-17.
Punishment for failure to appear.

Every member of the militia ordered out for duty, or who shall volunteer or be drafted, who does not appear at the time or place ordered, or who shall knowingly or wilfully evade the process of the sheriff or other authorized officer to avoid military duty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-29; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 19, eff from and after June 1, 1966.